test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-piassad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - piâssâd: # Verb 'to get to go' - full paradigm
     piâssâd+V+Inf: piâssâd
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piâzzam
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piâzzak
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peäss
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: piâssâp
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: piâssveʹted
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peäʹsse       #peäʹsˈse
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: piâzzât
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: piâzz
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pieʹssem      #pieʹsˈsem
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pieʹssiǩ      #pieʹsˈsiǩ
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: piâzzi
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [piâzzim, piâzzin]
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: piâzzid
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pieʹsse       #pieʹsˈse
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: pieʹsseš        #pieʹsˈseš
     piâssâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: piâssâm
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Sg1: piâzzžem
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Sg2: piâzzžiǩ
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Sg3: piâzzâž
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [piâzzžep, piâzzžim, piâzzžin]
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Pl2: piâzzžid
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Pl3: piâzzže
     piâssâd+V+Pot+Sg4: piâzzžet
     piâssâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: piâzzže
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Sg1: piâzzčem
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Sg2: piâzzčiǩ
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Sg3: piâzzči
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [piâzzčim, piâzzčin, piâzzčep]
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Pl2: piâzzčid
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Pl3: piâzzče
     piâssâd+V+Cond+Sg4: piâzzčeš
     piâssâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: piâzzče
     piâssâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: piâzz
     piâssâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: peäzzas
     piâssâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: piâssâp
     piâssâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: piâssâd
     piâssâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: peässaz        #peäsˈsaz
     piâssâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: piâssu      #piâsˈsu
     piâssâd+V+Actio+Ess: piâssmen
     piâssâd+V+Actio: piâssâm
     piâssâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: piâssi
     piâssâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: piâssâm
     piâssâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: piâssum      #piâsˈsum
     piâssâd+V+VAbess: [piâzzǩeânai, piâzzkâni, piâzzkani, piâzzǩani, piâzzǩâni]
     piâssâd+V+Ger+Ess: piâzzeen
     piâssâd+V+Ger+Instr: piâzzeeʹl
